Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 4

Gubernatorial Inauguration Finance Disclosure

2-10-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Gubernatorial Inauguration Finance Disclosure Act.”

Acts 2001, ch. 458, § 1.

2-10-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Contribution” means any advance, conveyance, deposit, distribution, transfer of funds, loan, loan guaranty, payment, gift, or subscription, of money or like thing of value, and any contract, agreement, promise or other obligation, whether or not legally enforceable, made for the purpose of defraying any expenses of a governor or governor-elect's inauguration or the celebration of a governor or governor-elect's inauguration;

“Multicandidate political campaign committee” means a political campaign committee to support or oppose two (2) or more candidates for public office or two (2) or more measures; and

“Person” means an individual, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, committee, association, labor organization or any other organization or group of persons, but does not mean a corporation or the executive officers or other representatives of a corporation.

Acts 2001, ch. 458, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1 provided that act is, and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Governmental Ethics Reform Act of 2006.”

2-10-403. Expense fund.

Not later than thirty (30) days after being elected to the office of governor, the governor-elect shall establish a gubernatorial inauguration expense fund that shall be used to finance any event held for the purpose of celebrating the governor's inauguration. Such fund is subject to the contribution limits and reporting requirements provided in this part. The provisions of parts 1 and 3 of this chapter shall not apply to contributions made pursuant to this part.

Acts 2001, ch. 458, § 1.

2-10-404. Contribution limits — Transfer of campaign funds.

No person shall make contributions for the gubernatorial inauguration that, in the aggregate, exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

No multicandidate political campaign committee shall make contributions for the gubernatorial inauguration that, in the aggregate, exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

No corporation or executive officers or other representatives of any corporation doing business within this state shall make contributions for the gubernatorial inauguration that, in the aggregate, exceed seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

The governor-elect may transfer funds from the governor-elect's campaign fund to the inauguration fund.

Acts 2001, ch. 458, § 1.

2-10-405. Financial disclosure statement.

The governor-elect shall file with the registry of election finance a statement of all contributions received and all expenditures made by or on behalf of the gubernatorial inauguration fund.

A statement filed under this section shall consist of either:

A statement that neither the contributions received nor the expenditures made during the period for which the statement is submitted exceeded one thousand dollars ($1,000); or

A statement setting forth:

Under contributions, a list of all the contributions received, as follows:

The statement shall list the full name and complete address of each person, multicandidate political campaign committee, or corporation contributing a total amount of more than five hundred dollars ($500) during the period for which the statement is submitted, and the amount contributed by that person, multicandidate political campaign committee, or corporation. The statement shall include the date of the receipt of each contribution; and

The statement shall list as a single item the total amount of contributions of five hundred dollars ($500) or less; and

Under expenditures, a list of all expenditures made as follows:

The statement shall list the full name and address of each person to whom a total amount of more than five hundred dollars ($500) was paid during the period for which the statement is submitted, the total amount paid to that person, and the purpose thereof; and

The statement shall list the total amount of expenditures of five hundred dollars ($500) or less each, by category, without showing the exact amount of or vouching for each such expenditure.

The financial disclosure statement for contributions made up until thirty (30) days before any inauguration event shall be filed no later than ten (10) days before the governor's inauguration. The financial disclosure statement for all other contributions shall be filed no later than thirty (30) days after the governor's inauguration.

Acts 2001, ch. 458, § 1.

2-10-406. Unused funds.

The governor may hold over funds from the governor's first inauguration to be used in a second inauguration if the governor is re-elected. If the governor is either in a second term, chooses not to run for re-election or is not re-elected, the governor has ninety (90) days to donate any funds remaining in the gubernatorial inauguration fund to a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization. The governor may request from the registry of election finance an extension of an additional sixty (60) days to donate such remaining funds.

Once the funds have been donated as provided in subsection (a), a financial disclosure statement shall be filed with the registry of election finance disclosing who received such funds and the amount of such donation.

Acts 2001, ch. 458, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 501(c)(3), referred to in this section, is codified at 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).